test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-3tav-vowel_changes.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vises: # 2A
    vises+N+Sg+Nom: vises
    vises+N+Sg+Gen: vissás
    vises+N+Sg+Acc: vissás
    vises+N+Sg+Ill: vissásân
    vises+N+Sg+Loc: vissásist
    vises+N+Sg+Com: vissásáin
    vises+N+Sg+Abe: vissásttáá
    vises+N+Ess:    visesin                 #visásin
    vises+N+Par:    visesid                 #visásid
    vises+N+Pl+Nom: vissáseh
    vises+N+Pl+Gen: vissásij
    vises+N+Pl+Acc: vissásijd
    vises+N+Pl+Ill: vissásáid
    vises+N+Pl+Loc: vissásijn
    vises+N+Pl+Com: vissásijguin
    vises+N+Pl+Abe: vissásijttáá

  Noun - oles: # 2A
    oles+N+Sg+Nom: oles
    oles+N+Sg+Gen: ollás
    oles+N+Sg+Acc: ollás
    oles+N+Sg+Ill: ollásân
    oles+N+Sg+Loc: ollásist
    oles+N+Sg+Com: ollásáin
    oles+N+Sg+Abe: ollásttáá
    oles+N+Ess:    olesin                 #olásin
    oles+N+Par:    olesid                 #olásid
    oles+N+Pl+Nom: olláseh
    oles+N+Pl+Gen: ollásij
    oles+N+Pl+Acc: ollásijd
    oles+N+Pl+Ill: ollásáid
    oles+N+Pl+Loc: ollásijn
    oles+N+Pl+Com: ollásijguin
    oles+N+Pl+Abe: ollásijttáá

  Noun - putes: # 2A
    putes+N+Sg+Nom: putes
    putes+N+Sg+Gen: puttás
    putes+N+Sg+Acc: puttás
    putes+N+Sg+Ill: puttásân
    putes+N+Sg+Loc: puttásist
    putes+N+Sg+Com: puttásáin
    putes+N+Sg+Abe: puttásttáá
    putes+N+Ess:    putesin                 #putásin
    putes+N+Par:    putesid                 #putásid
    putes+N+Pl+Nom: puttáseh
    putes+N+Pl+Gen: puttásij
    putes+N+Pl+Acc: puttásijd
    putes+N+Pl+Ill: puttásáid
    putes+N+Pl+Loc: puttásijn
    putes+N+Pl+Com: puttásijguin
    putes+N+Pl+Abe: puttásijttáá

  Noun - lines: # 2B
    lines+N+Sg+Nom: lines
    lines+N+Sg+Gen: linnáás
    lines+N+Sg+Acc: linnáás
    lines+N+Sg+Ill: linásân
    lines+N+Sg+Loc: linásist
    lines+N+Sg+Com: linásáin
    lines+N+Sg+Abe: linnáásttáá
    lines+N+Ess:    linesin                 
    lines+N+Par:    linesid                
    lines+N+Pl+Nom: lináseh
    lines+N+Pl+Gen: linásij
    lines+N+Pl+Acc: linásijd
    lines+N+Pl+Ill: linásáid
    lines+N+Pl+Loc: linásijn
    lines+N+Pl+Com: linásijguin
    lines+N+Pl+Abe: linásijttáá



  Noun - naver: # 2B
    naver+N+Sg+Nom: naver
    naver+N+Sg+Gen: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Acc: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Ill: naharân
    naver+N+Sg+Loc: naharist
    naver+N+Sg+Com: naharáin
    naver+N+Sg+Abe: nahhaarttáá
    naver+N+Ess: naverin                    #naharin
    naver+N+Par: naverid                    #naharid
    naver+N+Pl+Nom: nahareh
    naver+N+Pl+Gen: naharij
    naver+N+Pl+Acc: naharijd
    naver+N+Pl+Ill: naharáid
    naver+N+Pl+Loc: naharijn
    naver+N+Pl+Com: naharijguin
    naver+N+Pl+Abe: naharijttáá

  Noun - jäävvil: # 2B
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Nom: jäävvil
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Gen: jáhháál
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Acc: jáhháál
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Ill: jáhálân
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Loc: jáhálist
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Com: jáháláin
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Abe: jáhháálttáá
    jäävvil+N+Ess:    jävilin            #jáhálin
    jäävvil+N+Par:    jävilid            #jáhálid
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Nom: jáháleh
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Gen: jáhálij
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Acc: jáhálijd
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Ill: jáháláid
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Loc: jáhálijn
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Com: jáhálijguin
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Abe: jáhálijttáá


  Noun - päävir: # 2B
    päävir+N+Sg+Nom: päävir
    päävir+N+Sg+Gen: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Acc: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Ill: pápárân
    päävir+N+Sg+Loc: pápárist
    päävir+N+Sg+Com: pápáráin
    päävir+N+Sg+Abe: pááppárttáá
    päävir+N+Ess: pävirin                   #pápárin
    päävir+N+Par:  pävirid                  #pápárid 
    päävir+N+Pl+Nom: pápáreh
    päävir+N+Pl+Gen: pápárij
    päävir+N+Pl+Acc: pápárijd
    päävir+N+Pl+Ill: pápáráid
    päävir+N+Pl+Loc: pápárijn
    päävir+N+Pl+Com: pápárijguin
    päävir+N+Pl+Abe: pápárijttáá


  Noun - čeve: # 2B
    čeve+N+Sg+Nom: čeve
    čeve+N+Sg+Gen: čiäppát
    čeve+N+Sg+Acc: čiäppát
    čeve+N+Sg+Ill: čiäpáttân
    čeve+N+Sg+Loc: čiäpáttist
    čeve+N+Sg+Com: čiäpáttáin
    čeve+N+Sg+Abe: čiäppáttáá
    čeve+N+Ess: čevveen             #čiäpáttin
    čeve+N+Par: čevveed             #čiäpáttid
    čeve+N+Pl+Nom: čiäpátteh
    čeve+N+Pl+Gen: čiäpáttij
    čeve+N+Pl+Acc: čiäpáttijd
    čeve+N+Pl+Ill: čiäpáttáid
    čeve+N+Pl+Loc: čiäpáttijn
    čeve+N+Pl+Com: čiäpáttijguin
    čeve+N+Pl+Abe: čiäpáttijttáá

    
  Noun - veeskir: # 2A v -kk, sk s'k, ee >iä, VV V; C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    veeskir+N+Sg+Nom: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Gen: viäskár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Acc: viäskár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Ill: viäskárân
    veeskir+N+Sg+Loc: viäskárist
    veeskir+N+Sg+Com: viäskáráin
    veeskir+N+Sg+Abe: viäskárttáá
    veeskir+N+Ess:   veskirin           #viäskárin
    veeskir+N+Par:   veskirid           #viäskárid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Nom: viäskáreh
    veeskir+N+Pl+Gen: viäskárij
    veeskir+N+Pl+Acc: viäskárijd
    veeskir+N+Pl+Ill: viäskáráid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Loc: viäskárijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Com: viäskárijguin
    veeskir+N+Pl+Abe: viäskárijttáá

  Noun - kieles: # 2B
    kieles+N+Sg+Nom: kieles
    kieles+N+Sg+Gen: kiällás
    kieles+N+Sg+Acc: kiällás
    kieles+N+Sg+Ill: kiälásân
    kieles+N+Sg+Loc: kiälásist
    kieles+N+Sg+Com: kiälásáin
    kieles+N+Sg+Abe: kiällásttáá
    kieles+N+Ess:    kielesin              #kiälásin
    kieles+N+Par:    kielesid              #kiälásid
    kieles+N+Pl+Nom: kiäláseh
    kieles+N+Pl+Gen: kiälásij
    kieles+N+Pl+Acc: kiälásijd
    kieles+N+Pl+Ill: kiälásáid
    kieles+N+Pl+Loc: kiälásijn
    kieles+N+Pl+Com: kiälásijguin
    kieles+N+Pl+Abe: kiälásijttáá

  Noun - lyeme: # 2B
    lyeme+N+Sg+Nom: lyeme
    lyeme+N+Sg+Gen: luámmán
    lyeme+N+Sg+Acc: luámmán
    lyeme+N+Sg+Ill: luámánân
    lyeme+N+Sg+Loc: luámánist
    lyeme+N+Sg+Com: luámánáin
    lyeme+N+Sg+Abe: luámmánttáá
    lyeme+N+Ess: lyemeen                    #luámánin
    lyeme+N+Par: lyemeed                    #luámánid
    lyeme+N+Pl+Nom: luámáneh
    lyeme+N+Pl+Gen: luámánij
    lyeme+N+Pl+Acc: luámánijd
    lyeme+N+Pl+Ill: luámánáid
    lyeme+N+Pl+Loc: luámánijn
    lyeme+N+Pl+Com: luámánijguin
    lyeme+N+Pl+Abe: luámánijttáá
